Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.096

Medical providers—Failure to report or comply as required.

Any medical provider who fails, neglects, or refuses to file a report with the director, as required by this chapter, within five days of the date of treatment, showing the condition of the injured victim at the time of treatment, a description of the treatment given, and an estimate of the probable duration of the injury, or who fails or refuses to render all necessary assistance to the injured victim, as required by this chapter, shall be subject to a civil penalty determined by the director but not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars. The amount shall be paid into the crime victims' compensation account.

[ 2011 c 346 s 508.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.